Utah statutes.
25-5-7.   Contracts by telegraph deemed written.
Contracts made by telegraph shall be deemed to be contracts in writing, and
all communications sent by telegraph and signed by the person sending the
same, or by his authority, shall be deemed to be communications in writing.
